Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1547.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1011.15A of Title 56, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As a condition of eligibility for the state Medicaid


program, an individual shall fulfill the community engagement


requirement as provided by 42 U.S.C., Section 1396a(xx), unless


exempted under such section.


B. The Oklahoma Health Care Authority Board shall promulgate


rules as necessary to implement the provisions of this section.


SECTION 2. REPEALER 56 O.S. 2021, Section 1011.15, is


hereby repealed.

Req. No. 2363 Page 1


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective January 1, 2027.




60-2-2363 DC 1/12/2026 5:17:44 PM











































Req. No. 2363 Page 2